Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 3. Public Parks

Cross references. —

As to power of city relative to sale of unused park lands, see §

15-1-103

.

As to authority of city to establish and maintain zoological gardens, see §

15-1-103

.

As to band concerts, see §

15-1-901

et seq.

As to authority of cities and towns to borrow money or issue bonds for recreational facilities, see §

15-7-103

.

As to county parks, see §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-202

.

As to state parks and reserves generally, see §§

36-8-103

to

36-8-1002

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 560, 561 and 564 to 566; 70A Am. Jur. 2d Special or Local Assessments §§ 33, 44 and 45.

Liability of municipality owning public ball park for injuries by ball to person on nearby street or sidewalk, 16 ALR2d 1458.

Liability of municipality for injury to or death of child caused by burning from hot ashes, cinders or other hot waste material in park, 42 ALR2d 930.

§ 15-7-301.
Definition.

As used in this article “public park” means any public ground of any city or town dedicated to public use and maintained as a municipal park, playground or recreation area.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 437; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-437; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-302.
Vacation from public use; authorization.

The governing body of any city or town may vacate from public use any public park or part thereof located within the corporate limits of the city or town in the manner provided in this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 438; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-438; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Vacation of park property is a legislative function;

and once a city council determines that park property is to be vacated, the courts will not interfere unless the determination is brought about by fraud and collusion or is clearly arbitrary and a grave abuse of discretion. Neel v. Laramie, 488 P.2d 1056,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1971).

Benefit to abutting owner does not vitiate vacation. —

The mere fact that an abutting owner might receive some benefit will not of itself vitiate a vacation ordinance or furnish grounds to enjoin the vacation; and that is particularly true if there is evidence from which it can be determined that a public purpose is served. Neel v. Laramie, 488 P.2d 1056,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 15-7-303.
Vacation from public use; hearing; notice; contents; objections.

If the governing body considers it to be in the public interest to vacate any public park or part thereof from the public use to which it was dedicated, it shall set a time and place for a public hearing upon the proposal to vacate. Notice of the hearing shall be published for three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the hearing in a newspaper published in the county in which the city or town is located, or if there is no newspaper published in that county, then in a newspaper published in this state and of general circulation in that county. The notice shall contain a statement of the time, place and purpose of the hearing, the reason for the proposed vacation and shall provide that any person objecting to the proposed vacation shall file his objections with the city or town clerk in writing at least twenty-four (24) hours before the time of the hearing.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 439; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-439; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Stated

in

Neel v. City of Laramie, 488 P.2d 1056,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 15-7-304.
Vacation from public use; hearing; how conducted; order; record.

Any resident of the city or town, having filed his objections, may appear at the hearing and protest the proposed vacation. Any other resident of the city or town may appear at the hearing and offer evidence in support of the proposed vacation. If the governing body then finds that the vacation of the property from public use is in the best interests of the city or town and its residents, it may order the vacation by ordinance. The record of the proceedings of the public hearing, including the findings of the governing body, shall be made a part of the minutes of the regular or special meeting of the governing body at which the hearing was conducted.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 440; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-440; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-305.
Vacation from public use; cessation of duties; disposal.

Upon the passage of an ordinance vacating the property from public use, the city or town is relieved of all obligations to the public for maintaining the property as a public park, and it may dispose of the property in any manner provided by law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 441; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-441; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Use of property by private persons permitted. —

There can be no sound reason why, when property is not required for public purposes, the city may not permit its use by private persons, especially when the city has determined that the use is in the public interest. Neel v. Laramie, 488 P.2d 1056,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1971).